WebApplication17/ckDil/server/dictionaries/tr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2219 N 1
SFX 2219 0 yamadıklarını .
SFX 2220 N 1
SFX 2220 0 lemişlerdir .
SFX 2221 N 1
SFX 2221 0 leştirilmeleri .
SFX 2222 N 1
SFX 2222 0 tacaklarını .
SFX 2223 N 1
SFX 2223 0 amayacağının .
SFX 2224 N 1
SFX 2224 0 emiyorlardı .
SFX 2225 N 1
SFX 2225 0 ılığı .
SFX 2226 N 1
SFX 2226 0 mayışından .
SFX 2227 N 1
SFX 2227 0 amayacağınız .
SFX 2228 N 1
SFX 2228 0 tılmaya .
SFX 2229 N 1
SFX 2229 0 meksizin .
SFX 2230 N 1
SFX 2230 0 nebilir .
SFX 2231 N 1
SFX 2231 0 mıyorsun .
SFX 2232 N 1
SFX 2232 0 laşmadır .
SFX 2233 N 1
SFX 2233 0 larıydı .
SFX 2234 N 1
SFX 2234 0 lenemeyen .
SFX 2235 N 1
SFX 2235 0 cının .
SFX 2236 N 1
SFX 2236 0 ine .
SFX 2237 N 1
SFX 2237 0 diklerini .
SFX 2238 N 1
SFX 2238 0 maksızın .
SFX 2239 N 1
SFX 2239 0 ini .
SFX 2240 N 1
SFX 2240 0 li .
SFX 2241 N 1
SFX 2241 0 ledikleri .
SFX 2242 N 1
SFX 2242 0 le .
SFX 2243 N 1
SFX 2243 0 nemeyeceğine .
SFX 2244 N 1
SFX 2244 0 leriymiş .
SFX 2245 N 1
SFX 2245 0 diklerine .
SFX 2246 N 1
SFX 2246 0 imlerinin .
SFX 2247 N 1
SFX 2247 0 ulduğu .
SFX 2248 N 1
SFX 2248 0 la .
SFX 2249 N 1
SFX 2249 0 leşmeyen .
SFX 2250 N 1
SFX 2250 0 acağını .
SFX 2251 N 1
SFX 2251 0 leştiği .
SFX 2252 N 1
SFX 2252 0 lamazken .
SFX 2253 N 1
SFX 2253 0 ındasın .
SFX 2254 N 1
SFX 2254 0 laşabilecek .
SFX 2255 N 1
SFX 2255 0 larınca .
SFX 2256 N 1
SFX 2256 0 lese .
SFX 2257 N 1
SFX 2257 0 yin .
SFX 2258 N 1
SFX 2258 0 laşınca .
SFX 2259 N 1
SFX 2259 0 yim .
SFX 2260 N 1
SFX 2260 0 dü .
SFX 2261 N 1
SFX 2261 0 ebilmenin .
SFX 2262 N 1
SFX 2262 0 dıktan .
SFX 2263 N 1
SFX 2263 0 leştirilecek .
SFX 2264 N 1
SFX 2264 0 mamışken .
SFX 2265 N 1
SFX 2265 0 laşmaları .
SFX 2266 N 1
SFX 2266 0 lememeleri .
SFX 2267 N 1
SFX 2267 0 amayabileceğini .
SFX 2268 N 1
SFX 2268 0 laştırdığına .
SFX 2269 N 1
SFX 2269 0 lığındaki .
SFX 2270 N 1
SFX 2270 0 ladığı .
SFX 2271 N 1
SFX 2271 0 üldüğünü .
SFX 2272 N 1
SFX 2272 0 yabilmeli .
SFX 2273 N 1
SFX 2273 0 ir .
SFX 2274 N 1
SFX 2274 0 larında .
SFX 2275 N 1
SFX 2275 0 acağımı .
SFX 2276 N 1
SFX 2276 0 tmasın .
SFX 2277 N 1
SFX 2277 0 iyorlardı .
SFX 2278 N 1
SFX 2278 0 enlerinde .
SFX 2279 N 1
SFX 2279 0 yiz .
SFX 2280 N 1
SFX 2280 0 cı .
SFX 2281 N 1
SFX 2281 0 lananları .
SFX 2282 N 1
SFX 2282 0 liydi .
SFX 2283 N 1
SFX 2283 0 malıdır .
SFX 2284 N 1
SFX 2284 0 ik .
SFX 2285 N 1
SFX 2285 0 usun .
SFX 2286 N 1
SFX 2286 0 luklarından .
SFX 2287 N 1
SFX 2287 0 landıklarından .
SFX 2288 N 1
SFX 2288 0 erken .
SFX 2289 N 1
SFX 2289 0 yip .
SFX 2290 N 1
SFX 2290 0 im .
SFX 2291 N 1
SFX 2291 0 in .
SFX 2292 N 1
SFX 2292 0 ile .
SFX 2293 N 1
SFX 2293 0 ip .
SFX 2294 N 1
SFX 2294 0 tmışlardı .
SFX 2295 N 1
SFX 2295 0 üldüğü .
SFX 2296 N 1
SFX 2296 0 larındayız .
SFX 2297 N 1
SFX 2297 0 memesinden .
SFX 2298 N 1
SFX 2298 0 iz .
SFX 2299 N 1
SFX 2299 0 leştirebilecek .
SFX 2300 N 1
SFX 2300 0 dıracaktır .
SFX 2301 N 1
SFX 2301 0 melerin .
SFX 2302 N 1
SFX 2302 0 lemekle .
SFX 2303 N 1
SFX 2303 0 yıcılığını .
SFX 2304 N 1
SFX 2304 0 mazken .
SFX 2305 N 1
SFX 2305 0 sizliğinin .
SFX 2306 N 1
SFX 2306 0 leşeceğinin .
SFX 2307 N 1
SFX 2307 0 ladılar .
SFX 2308 N 1
SFX 2308 0 luğunu .
SFX 2309 N 1
SFX 2309 0 yabilmesi .
SFX 2310 N 1
SFX 2310 0 iyorsunuz .
SFX 2311 N 1
SFX 2311 0 tenler .
SFX 2312 N 1
SFX 2312 0 ndıklarına .
SFX 2313 N 1
SFX 2313 0 leyişi .
SFX 2314 N 1
SFX 2314 0 lesin .
SFX 2315 N 1
SFX 2315 0 amayacaklar .
SFX 2316 N 1
SFX 2316 0 ındayken .
SFX 2317 N 1
SFX 2317 0 lanacağına .
SFX 2318 N 1
SFX 2318 0 cılarda .
SFX 2319 N 1
SFX 2319 0 ırsanız .
SFX 2320 N 1
SFX 2320 0 sü .
SFX 2321 N 1
SFX 2321 0 şmiş .
SFX 2322 N 1
SFX 2322 0 lenmediği .
SFX 2323 N 1
SFX 2323 0 yamıyorum .
SFX 2324 N 1
SFX 2324 0 laşacağını .
SFX 2325 N 1
SFX 2325 0 tılmalıdır .
SFX 2326 N 1
SFX 2326 0 ebildikleri .
SFX 2327 N 1
SFX 2327 0 ladıklarının .
SFX 2328 N 1
SFX 2328 0 lıyorsun .
SFX 2329 N 1
SFX 2329 0 ındaki .
SFX 2330 N 1
SFX 2330 0 amadığından .
SFX 2331 N 1
SFX 2331 0 landırmak .
SFX 2332 N 1
SFX 2332 0 meyeceklerdir .
SFX 2333 N 1
SFX 2333 0 lanmalarından .
SFX 2334 N 1
SFX 2334 0 laştırıldığında .
SFX 2335 N 1
SFX 2335 0 çunun .
SFX 2336 N 1
SFX 2336 0 nıza .
SFX 2337 N 1
SFX 2337 0 amayacaklarına .
SFX 2338 N 1
SFX 2338 0 rken .
SFX 2339 N 1
SFX 2339 0 lıları .
SFX 2340 N 1
SFX 2340 0 mızdan .
SFX 2341 N 1
SFX 2341 0 lamayanlar .
SFX 2342 N 1
SFX 2342 0 laştırmalıyız .
SFX 2343 N 1
SFX 2343 0 tılacak .
SFX 2344 N 1
SFX 2344 0 meler .
SFX 2345 N 1
SFX 2345 0 leye .
SFX 2346 N 1
SFX 2346 0 ndırdığı .
SFX 2347 N 1
SFX 2347 0 ılmadığına .
SFX 2348 N 1
SFX 2348 0 lanma .
SFX 2349 N 1
SFX 2349 0 laşmıyor .
SFX 2350 N 1
SFX 2350 0 ılamayacağının .
SFX 2351 N 1
SFX 2351 0 yamıyoruz .
SFX 2352 N 1
SFX 2352 0 emeyecekler .
SFX 2353 N 1
SFX 2353 0 melik .
SFX 2354 N 1
SFX 2354 0 tırmaları .
SFX 2355 N 1
SFX 2355 0 ümüz .
SFX 2356 N 1
SFX 2356 0 lamadık .
SFX 2357 N 1
SFX 2357 0 leyebilir .
SFX 2358 N 1
SFX 2358 0 lamadım .
SFX 2359 N 1
SFX 2359 0 leyemedik .
SFX 2360 N 1
SFX 2360 0 ümün .
SFX 2361 N 1
SFX 2361 0 ememelerine .
SFX 2362 N 1
SFX 2362 0 uz .
SFX 2363 N 1
SFX 2363 0 medikleri .
SFX 2364 N 1
SFX 2364 0 yebildiğini .
SFX 2365 N 1
SFX 2365 0 lıklarının .
SFX 2366 N 1
SFX 2366 0 layabiliriz .
SFX 2367 N 1
SFX 2367 0 ılmalarında .
SFX 2368 N 1
SFX 2368 0 dıkları .
SFX 2369 N 1
SFX 2369 0 lıklarınız .
SFX 2370 N 1
SFX 2370 0 ciliğinin .
SFX 2371 N 1
SFX 2371 0 lamadığını .
SFX 2372 N 1
SFX 2372 0 yana .
SFX 2373 N 1
SFX 2373 0 emiyorsanız .
SFX 2374 N 1
SFX 2374 0 düğüne .
SFX 2375 N 1
SFX 2375 0 irsiniz .
SFX 2376 N 1
SFX 2376 0 mayasınız .
SFX 2377 N 1
SFX 2377 0 melerde .
SFX 2378 N 1
SFX 2378 0 malarla .
SFX 2379 N 1
SFX 2379 0 amazsam .
SFX 2380 N 1
SFX 2380 0 indedirler .
SFX 2381 N 1
SFX 2381 0 amazsak .
SFX 2382 N 1
SFX 2382 0 dıran .
SFX 2383 N 1
SFX 2383 0 ası .
SFX 2384 N 1
SFX 2384 0 leştirmeliyiz .
SFX 2385 N 1
SFX 2385 0 um .
SFX 2386 N 1
SFX 2386 0 un .
SFX 2387 N 1
SFX 2387 0 up .
SFX 2388 N 1
SFX 2388 0 lenişine .
SFX 2389 N 1
SFX 2389 0 tırılmış .
SFX 2390 N 1
SFX 2390 0 masız .
SFX 2391 N 1
SFX 2391 0 tu .
SFX 2392 N 1
SFX 2392 0 landı .
SFX 2393 N 1
SFX 2393 0 nı .
SFX 2394 N 1
SFX 2394 0 ısınız .
SFX 2395 N 1
SFX 2395 0 liklerinden .
SFX 2396 N 1
SFX 2396 0 lanmışlardı .
SFX 2397 N 1
SFX 2397 0 laştırılmasına .
SFX 2398 N 1
SFX 2398 0 lenişini .
SFX 2399 N 1
SFX 2399 0 nmadığını .
SFX 2400 N 1
SFX 2400 0 nmadı .
SFX 2401 N 1
SFX 2401 0 ıyor .
SFX 2402 N 1
SFX 2402 0 mıyordum .
SFX 2403 N 1
SFX 2403 0 madığımı .
SFX 2404 N 1
SFX 2404 0 ıcılıkları .
SFX 2405 N 1
SFX 2405 0 amazlar .
SFX 2406 N 1
SFX 2406 0 nını .
SFX 2407 N 1
SFX 2407 0 luları .
SFX 2408 N 1
SFX 2408 0 nmemiş .
SFX 2409 N 1
SFX 2409 0 te .
SFX 2410 N 1
SFX 2410 0 laştırılabileceğini .
SFX 2411 N 1
SFX 2411 0 ılmayacak .
SFX 2412 N 1
SFX 2412 0 ıysa .
SFX 2413 N 1
SFX 2413 0 mediğini .
SFX 2414 N 1
SFX 2414 0 ti .
SFX 2415 N 1
SFX 2415 0 dıramayacağını .
SFX 2416 N 1
SFX 2416 0 indendi .
SFX 2417 N 1
SFX 2417 0 sünün .
SFX 2418 N 1
SFX 2418 0 leştirilerek .
SFX 2419 N 1
SFX 2419 0 ta .
SFX 2420 N 1
SFX 2420 0 mamakla .
SFX 2421 N 1
SFX 2421 0 su .
SFX 2422 N 1
SFX 2422 0 üdür .
SFX 2423 N 1
SFX 2423 0 lerdendir .
SFX 2424 N 1
SFX 2424 0 ilerek .
SFX 2425 N 1
SFX 2425 0 lanırsa .
SFX 2426 N 1
SFX 2426 0 mı .
SFX 2427 N 1
SFX 2427 0 nmışım .
SFX 2428 N 1
SFX 2428 0 liğimiz .
SFX 2429 N 1
SFX 2429 0 ileni .
SFX 2430 N 1
SFX 2430 0 sünüz .
SFX 2431 N 1
SFX 2431 0 layışında .
SFX 2432 N 1
SFX 2432 0 sizliğinde .
SFX 2433 N 1
SFX 2433 0 ılamazdı .
SFX 2434 N 1
SFX 2434 0 laştırılmasını .
SFX 2435 N 1
SFX 2435 0 laştırmaktan .
SFX 2436 N 1
SFX 2436 0 leştiremeyeceğini .
SFX 2437 N 1
SFX 2437 0 nmama .
SFX 2438 N 1
SFX 2438 0 se .
SFX 2439 N 1
SFX 2439 0 ununu .
SFX 2440 N 1
SFX 2440 0 enlerle .
SFX 2441 N 1
SFX 2441 0 si .
SFX 2442 N 1
SFX 2442 0 layacaktı .
SFX 2443 N 1
SFX 2443 0 ikleri .
SFX 2444 N 1
SFX 2444 0 ebilmeli .
SFX 2445 N 1
SFX 2445 0 ılmayacağının .
SFX 2446 N 1
SFX 2446 0 sa .
SFX 2447 N 1
SFX 2447 0 teyim .
SFX 2448 N 1
SFX 2448 0 miyor .
SFX 2449 N 1
SFX 2449 0 lense .
SFX 2450 N 1
SFX 2450 0 liğimin .
SFX 2451 N 1
SFX 2451 0 lı .
SFX 2452 N 1
SFX 2452 0 yıcıları .
SFX 2453 N 1
SFX 2453 0 ememelerini .
SFX 2454 N 1
SFX 2454 0 layanlara .
SFX 2455 N 1
SFX 2455 0 abildiğine .
SFX 2456 N 1
SFX 2456 0 mamasını .
SFX 2457 N 1
SFX 2457 0 abildiğini .
SFX 2458 N 1
SFX 2458 0 siniz .
SFX 2459 N 1
SFX 2459 0 ununa .
SFX 2460 N 1
SFX 2460 0 landırılmalı .
SFX 2461 N 1
SFX 2461 0 leştikten .
SFX 2462 N 1
SFX 2462 0 nebileceği .
SFX 2463 N 1
SFX 2463 0 larınla .
SFX 2464 N 1
SFX 2464 0 amayacaklarını .
SFX 2465 N 1
SFX 2465 0 lemeler .
SFX 2466 N 1
SFX 2466 0 lıktı .
SFX 2467 N 1
SFX 2467 0 malarında .
SFX 2468 N 1
SFX 2468 0 tayım .
SFX 2469 N 1
SFX 2469 0 laştırdığını .
SFX 2470 N 1
SFX 2470 0 laşmaların .
SFX 2471 N 1
SFX 2471 0 melisin .
SFX 2472 N 1
SFX 2472 0 nememiştir .
SFX 2473 N 1
SFX 2473 0 culuğundan .
SFX 2474 N 1
SFX 2474 0 lerinse .
SFX 2475 N 1
SFX 2475 0 ındadır .
SFX 2476 N 1
SFX 2476 0 madığını .
SFX 2477 N 1
SFX 2477 0 dirmiştir .
SFX 2478 N 1
SFX 2478 0 luğumu .
SFX 2479 N 1
SFX 2479 0 iymiş .
SFX 2480 N 1
SFX 2480 0 arız .
SFX 2481 N 1
SFX 2481 0 luklara .
SFX 2482 N 1
SFX 2482 0 eler .
SFX 2483 N 1
SFX 2483 0 namadıkları .
SFX 2484 N 1
SFX 2484 0 iş .
SFX 2485 N 1
SFX 2485 0 liğimle .
SFX 2486 N 1
SFX 2486 0 lanamadıklarını .
SFX 2487 N 1
SFX 2487 0 lü .
SFX 2488 N 1
SFX 2488 0 iciliğinden .
SFX 2489 N 1
SFX 2489 0 lılara .
SFX 2490 N 1
SFX 2490 0 ılmayan .
SFX 2491 N 1
SFX 2491 0 mamışlardır .
SFX 2492 N 1
SFX 2492 0 düğünü .
SFX 2493 N 1
SFX 2493 0 luğuna .
SFX 2494 N 1
SFX 2494 0 landırmalarını .
SFX 2495 N 1
SFX 2495 0 arım .
SFX 2496 N 1
SFX 2496 0 dığındaysa .
SFX 2497 N 1
SFX 2497 0 cılarla .
SFX 2498 N 1
SFX 2498 0 iyorsanız .
SFX 2499 N 1
SFX 2499 0 lenmeden .
SFX 2500 N 1
SFX 2500 0 abilecekleri .
SFX 2501 N 1
SFX 2501 0 lıdan .
SFX 2502 N 1
SFX 2502 0 tacağını .
SFX 2503 N 1
SFX 2503 0 lamışlardır .
SFX 2504 N 1
SFX 2504 0 ttığını .
SFX 2505 N 1
SFX 2505 0 laşamayacak .
SFX 2506 N 1
SFX 2506 0 imlerindeki .
SFX 2507 N 1
SFX 2507 0 laşmasında .
SFX 2508 N 1
SFX 2508 0 tmişler .
SFX 2509 N 1
SFX 2509 0 landırmaya .
SFX 2510 N 1
SFX 2510 0 madığı .
SFX 2511 N 1
SFX 2511 0 leşemeyen .
SFX 2512 N 1
SFX 2512 0 laştığında .
SFX 2513 N 1
SFX 2513 0 lüğüne .
SFX 2514 N 1
SFX 2514 0 alı .
SFX 2515 N 1
SFX 2515 0 nmakla .
SFX 2516 N 1
SFX 2516 0 madığına .
SFX 2517 N 1
SFX 2517 0 ulabileceğini .
SFX 2518 N 1
SFX 2518 0 indendir .
SFX 2519 N 1
SFX 2519 0 yabileceğiniz .
SFX 2520 N 1
SFX 2520 0 lamayacaktır .
SFX 2521 N 1
SFX 2521 0 meyenler .
SFX 2522 N 1
SFX 2522 0 leyeceklerine .
SFX 2523 N 1
SFX 2523 0 amamasından .
SFX 2524 N 1
SFX 2524 0 yı .
SFX 2525 N 1
SFX 2525 0 leyeceklerini .
SFX 2526 N 1
SFX 2526 0 amadığına .
SFX 2527 N 1
SFX 2527 0 nişini .
SFX 2528 N 1
SFX 2528 0 'dayız .
SFX 2529 N 1
SFX 2529 0 nabildiği .
SFX 2530 N 1
SFX 2530 0 indeki .
SFX 2531 N 1
SFX 2531 0 ttıklarında .
SFX 2532 N 1
SFX 2532 0 laşacağına .
SFX 2533 N 1
SFX 2533 0 yü .
SFX 2534 N 1
SFX 2534 0 teydi .
SFX 2535 N 1
SFX 2535 0 'una .
SFX 2536 N 1
SFX 2536 0 lanacağını .
SFX 2537 N 1
SFX 2537 0 leşeceği .
SFX 2538 N 1
SFX 2538 0 ilmesini .
SFX 2539 N 1
SFX 2539 0 'unu .
SFX 2540 N 1
SFX 2540 0 laştırdıkları .
SFX 2541 N 1
SFX 2541 0 tıldığını .
SFX 2542 N 1
SFX 2542 0 cisi .
SFX 2543 N 1
SFX 2543 0 lanacak .
SFX 2544 N 1
SFX 2544 0 ılışının .
SFX 2545 N 1
SFX 2545 0 ilmesine .
SFX 2546 N 1
SFX 2546 0 tirmiş .
SFX 2547 N 1
SFX 2547 0 nmadığına .
SFX 2548 N 1
SFX 2548 0 lenirdi .
SFX 2549 N 1
SFX 2549 0 lenmeler .
SFX 2550 N 1
SFX 2550 0 lerimizi .
SFX 2551 N 1
SFX 2551 0 laştırmanın .
SFX 2552 N 1
SFX 2552 0 layanın .
SFX 2553 N 1
SFX 2553 0 lansa .
SFX 2554 N 1
SFX 2554 0 leştirdikleri .
SFX 2555 N 1
SFX 2555 0 nızı .
SFX 2556 N 1
SFX 2556 0 mızla .
SFX 2557 N 1
SFX 2557 0 laşmasını .
SFX 2558 N 1
SFX 2558 0 laşacak .
SFX 2559 N 1
SFX 2559 0 uş .
SFX 2560 N 1
SFX 2560 0 leniş .
SFX 2561 N 1
SFX 2561 0 lerimize .
SFX 2562 N 1
SFX 2562 0 yerek .
SFX 2563 N 1
SFX 2563 0 dadır .
SFX 2564 N 1
SFX 2564 0 ememenin .
